Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1622
Agent's permit; application; procedure.

An applicant for an agent's permit shall be an individual of good reputation and character and shall represent only private postsecondary career schools which meet the minimum standards established pursuant to sections 85-1606 and 85-1608. Each person desiring to perform the services of an agent in this state shall make application to the department upon forms to be provided by the department. The application shall state the school which the applicant intends to represent and shall include the applicant's social security number. An agent shall obtain a separate agent's permit for each school represented. A single agent's permit and surety bond for one school with one or more branch facilities shall extend to cover all branch facilities. The application for an agent's permit shall also be accompanied by evidence of a surety bond as provided in section 85-1640 and payment of the application fee provided in section 85-1643.

If any school which the applicant intends to represent is not domiciled in this state, the application shall be accompanied by the information required of schools making application for authorization to operate and evidence to show that its place of business outside this state has been licensed or approved for operation by the appropriate state agency in the state in which it is domiciled. If the state of domicile of the school has no authorization law for private postsecondary career schools or no such law applies to a particular school or course of study or instruction concerning which the applicant intends to act as an agent, the school shall (1) submit all information required of schools applying for authorization to operate in this state and show evidence that it has been accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education as specified in section 85-1609 and (2) file with the department a school bond in at least the amount required by section 85-1639.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 22;

Laws 1982, LB 370, § 7;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 22;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2822;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 22;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 230;

Laws 2003, LB 685, § 33.